Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF66.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1244XS (4) 91 as/js S.F. 66 Section 1. Section 915.38, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. Upon its own motion or upon motion of any party, a 3 court may protect a minor, as defined in section 599.1 , 4 from trauma caused by testifying in the physical presence of 5 the defendant where it would impair the minorâs ability to 6 communicate, by ordering that the testimony of the minor be 7 taken in a room other than the courtroom and be televised by 8 two-way closed-circuit equipment for viewing in the courtroom. 9 However, such an order shall be entered only upon a specific 10 finding by the court that such measures are necessary to 11 protect the minor from trauma. Only the judge, prosecuting 12 attorney, defendantâs attorney, persons necessary to operate 13 the equipment, and any person whose presence, in the opinion 14 of the court, would contribute to the welfare and well-being 15 of the minor may be present in the room with the minor during 16 the minorâs testimony. The judge shall inform the minor that 17 the defendant will not be present in the room in which the 18 minor will be testifying but that the defendant will be viewing 19 the minorâs testimony through closed-circuit television , and 20 that the minor will be able to view the defendant while giving 21 testimony . 22